Utah statutes.
34-34-5.   Any agreement, understanding or practice designed to violate
chapter declared illegal.
Any express or implied agreement, understanding or practice which is designed
to cause or require, or has the effect of causing or requiring, any employer
or labor union, labor organization or any other type of association, whether
or not a party thereto, to violate any provision of this chapter is hereby
declared an illegal agreement, understanding, or practice and contrary to
public policy.
